Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-111
Usury; civil proceedings; testimony of lender compellable.

Any person charged with taking illegal interest may be required to answer touching the same, on oath, in any civil proceeding.

Laws 1879, § 6, p. 114;

R.S.1913, § 3351;

C.S.1922, § 2839;

C.S.1929, § 45-106;

R.S.1943, § 45-111.